punjabi_to_ltn.xfscript
! Script for latin to syll for Gurmukhi script, 
! or more general, for Punjabi

define Decapitalisation [ A -> a , 
                          B -> b ,
                          C -> c ,
                          D -> d ,
                          E -> e ,
                          F -> f ,
                          G -> g ,
                          H -> h ,
                          I -> i ,
                          J -> j ,
                          K -> k ,
                          L -> l ,
                          M -> m ,
                          N -> n ,
                          O -> o ,
                          P -> p ,
                          Q -> q ,
                          R -> r ,
                          S -> s ,
                          T -> t ,
                          U -> u ,
                          V -> v ,
                          W -> w ,
                          X -> x ,
                          Y -> y ,
                          Z -> z ]
                          ;

define LengthSymbol [ ā -> â ,  
                      ē -> ê ,  
                      ī -> î ,  
                      ō -> ô ,
                      Ā -> â ,
                      Ē -> ê ,
                      Ī -> î ,
                      Ō -> ô ,
                      e -> ê ]
                      ;

! special symbol rules rules 

define bindiRule [ ṃ ] -> ◌ਂ ;
define tippiRule [ m̆  ] -> ◌ੰ ;
define doubeRule  -> ◌ੱ ;                 !doubles the following consonant



! 3-letter symbols

define bhaRule [ b h a ] -> ਭ  ;  
define chaRule [ c h a ] -> ਛ  ;  
define dhaRule [ d h a ] -> ਧ  ; 
define ḍhaRule [ ḍ h a ] -> ਧ  ;   
define jhaRule [ j h a ] -> ਝ  ;   
define ghaRule [ g h a ] -> ਗ਼  ;   
define khaRule [ k h a ] -> ਖ  ;      
define phaRule [ p h a ] -> ਫ   ;   
define ṭhaRule [ ṭ h a ] -> ਠ   ; 
define shaRule [ s h a ] -> ਸ਼   ; 



! Without v x q
! two-letter symbols

define aiRule [ a i ] -> ਐ  ;  
define auRule [ a u ] -> ਔ  ;  

define baRule [ b a ] -> ਬ  ;  
define caRule [ c a ] -> ਚ  ;  
define daRule [ d a ] -> ਦ  ;  
define ḍaRule [ ḍ a ] -> ਡ  ;
define faRule [ f a ] -> ਫ਼  ;  
define gaRule [ g a ] -> ਗ  ;  
define haRule [ h a ] -> ਹ  ; 
define jaRule [ j a ] -> ਜ  ; 
define kaRule [ k a ] -> ਕ  ; 
define laRule [ l a ] -> ਲ   ; 
define ḷaRule [ ḷ a ] -> ਲੵ  ; 
define maRule [ m a ] -> ਮ  ; 
define naRule [ n a ] -> ਨ  ; 
define ñaRule [ ñ a ] -> ਞ  ; 
define paRule [ p a ] -> ਪ  ; 
define raRule [ r a ] -> ਰ  ; 
define ṛaRule [ ṛ a ] -> ੜ  ; 
define saRule [ s a ] -> ਸ  ; 
define taRule [ t a ] -> ਤ   ; 
define waRule [ w a ] -> ਵ  ; 
define yaRule [ y a ] -> ਯ  ; 
define zaRule [ z a ] -> ਜ਼   ; 

! one-letter symbols

define aRule [ a ] -> ਅ      ;  
define iRule [ i ] -> ਇ     ;  
define oRule [ o ] -> ਓ  ;  
define uRule [ u ] -> ਉ  ; 
define eRule [ e ] -> ਏ  ; 
define âRule [ â ] -> ਆ  ;  
define îRule [ î ] -> ਈ  ;  
define ūRule [ ū  ] -> ਊ  ;  
   
  

define spaceRule [ % ] -> [ %  %  %  ]; 
define hyphenRule [ %- ] -> [ %  ]; # standard space for hyphen alternative as more convenient input.

define FullStopRule [ %. ] -> "|" ;
 
read regex [ Decapitalisation
.o. LengthSymbol

.o. bindiRule 
.o. tippiRule 
!.o. doubeRule 

.o. chaRule
.o. dhaRule
.o. ḍhaRule
.o. ghaRule
.o. jhaRule
.o. ghaRule
.o. khaRule
.o. phaRule
.o. ṭhaRule
.o. shaRule

.o. aiRule
.o. auRule
.o. baRule
.o. caRule
.o. daRule
.o. faRule
.o. gaRule

.o. haRule
.o. jaRule
.o. kaRule
.o. laRule
.o. naRule
.o. ñaRule
.o. paRule

.o. raRule
.o. saRule
.o. taRule
.o. waRule
.o. yaRule
.o. zaRule

.o. aRule
.o. iRule
.o. oRule
.o. uRule
.o. eRule
.o. âRule
.o. îRule
.o. ūRule


.o. spaceRule
.o. hyphenRule 

.o. FullStopRule ] ; 

define rules;
load stack punjabi_analyser.fst
define Analyser;
read regex [Analyser.o.rules];
save stack punjabi_script_analyser.fst
